Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1178.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2739XC (2) 91 da/ns S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 468.27, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. a. When the county auditor first 3 receives either the survey and report, or a permanent survey, 4 plat, and profile, as provided in subsection 2, the county 5 auditor shall prepare and file with the county recorder a 6 district parcel record that identifies all parcels contained 7 within the district that is part of the county. 8 b. (1) A county auditor who has not filed a document 9 described in paragraph âaâ as a district parcel record with the 10 county recorder before the effective date of this Act shall 11 prepare and file the district parcel record on or before June 12 30, 2026. 13 (2) This paragraph âbâ is repealed July 1, 2026. 14